Hawaii statutes.
§334-60.7 Notice of intent to discharge. (a)
For civil commitments that result directly from legal proceedings under
chapters 704 and 706, when the administrator or attending physician of a
psychiatric facility contemplates discharge of an involuntary patient because
of expiration of the court order for commitment or because the patient is no
longer a proper subject for commitment, as determined by the criteria for
involuntary hospitalization in section 334-60.2, the administrator or attending
physician shall provide notice of intent to discharge, or if the patient
voluntarily agrees to further hospitalization, the administrator shall provide
notice of the patient's admission to voluntary inpatient treatment. The
following requirements and procedures shall apply:

(1) The notice and a certificate of service shall be
filed with the family court and served on those persons whom the order of
commitment specifies as entitled to receive notice, by mail at the person's
last known address. Notice shall also be sent to the prosecuting attorney of
the county from which the person was originally committed, by facsimile or
electronically, for the sole purpose of victim notification;

(2) Any person specified as entitled to receive
notice may waive this right in writing with the psychiatric facility;

(3) If no objection is filed within five calendar
days of mailing the notice, the administrator or attending physician of the
psychiatric facility shall discharge the patient or accept the patient for
voluntary inpatient treatment;

(4) If any person specified as entitled to receive
notice files a written objection, with a certificate of service, to the
discharge or to the patient's admission to voluntary inpatient treatment on the
grounds that the patient is a proper subject for commitment, the family court
shall conduct a hearing as soon as possible, prior to the termination of the
current commitment order, to determine if the patient still meets the criteria
for involuntary hospitalization in section 334-60.2. The person filing the
objection shall also notify the psychiatric facility by telephone on the date
the objection is filed;

(5) If the family court finds that the patient does
not meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization in section 334-60.2, the
court shall issue an order of discharge from the commitment; and

(6) If the family court finds that the patient does
meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization in section 334-60.2, the
court shall issue an order denying discharge from the commitment.

(b) For civil commitments that do not result
directly from legal proceedings under chapters 704 and 706, when the
administrator or attending physician of a psychiatric facility contemplates
discharge of an involuntary patient, the administrator or attending physician
may assess whether an assisted community treatment plan is indicated pursuant
to section 334-123 and, if so indicated, may communicate with an aftercare
provider as part of discharge planning, as appropriate. [L 1984, c 188, pt of
§3; am L 1988, c 44, §2; am L 2014, c 156, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next